District of Columbia statutes.
7-1202.04

Revocation of authorization.

Except as provided in § 7-1202.02(a)(3), the person or persons who authorize a disclosure may revoke an authorization by providing a written revocation to the recipient named in the authorization and to the mental health professional, mental health facility or data collector authorized to disclose mental health information. The revocation of authorization shall be effective upon receipt. After the effective revocation date, no mental health information may be disclosed pursuant to the authorization. However, mental health information previously disclosed may be used for the purposes stated in the written authorization.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 204, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2014.
1973 Ed., § 6-1618.